Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,365
Diesel-powered motor vehicle; smoke; shade, density, or opacity.

No one shall operate a diesel-powered motor vehicle on any highway in this state in such a manner that smoke discharged from the exhaust is of a shade or density equal to or darker than that designated as Number 1 of the Ringelmann Chart or equivalent opacity of twenty percent for ten consecutive seconds or longer.

Laws 1972, LB 1360, § 3;

Laws 1976, LB 823, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-2203;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 461.